North Dakota, session 69, SB2002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
judicial branch for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the judicial branch, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
SUPREME COURT
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $12,363,778 $1,368,155 $13,731,933
New and vacant FTE pool 8,740,214 (767,241) 7,972,973
Operating expenses 2,915,259 219,534 3,134,793
Office of guardianship and conservatorship 0 375,478 375,478
Capital assets 0 866,100 866,100
Total all funds $24,019,251 $2,062,026 $26,081,277
Less other funds 97,793 (53,664) 44,129
Total general fund $23,921,458 $2,115,690 $26,037,148
Subdivision 2.
DISTRICT COURTS
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $79,576,340 $12,513,343 $92,089,683
Operating expenses 24,524,619 3,318,107 27,842,726
Capital assets 0 5,142,216 5,142,216
Judges' retirement 177,340 (13,666) 163,674
Total all funds $104,278,299 $20,960,000 $125,238,299
Less other funds 830,318 4,256,680 5,086,998
Total general fund $103,447,981 $16,703,320 $120,151,301
Subdivision 3.
JUDICIAL CONDUCT COMMISSION AND DISCIPLINARY BOARD
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Judicial conduct commission and $1,399,862 $181,073 $1,580,935

S. B. NO. 2002 - PAGE 2
disciplinary board
Total all funds $1,399,862 $181,073 $1,580,935
Less other funds 512,317 4,314 516,631
Total general fund $887,545 $176,759 $1,064,304
Subdivision 4.
TOTAL - SECTION 1
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $129,697,412 $23,203,099 $152,900,511
Grand total other funds 1,440,428 4,207,330 5,647,758
Grand total general fund $128,256,984 $18,995,769 $147,252,753
Full-time equivalent positions 384.00 10.00 394.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO THE
SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items
included in the appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget
for the 2027-29 biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total Funds
Information technology equipment $874,216 $0 $874,216
lease
Case management software cloud 0 758,000 758,000
migration
Clerk filing software 0 1,250,000 1,250,000
Court records access system 0 960,000 960,000
Cloud-based storage fees 866,100 0 866,100
Courtroom audio and video equipment 0 1,200,000 1,200,000
Cass County courtroom equipment 0 100,000 100,000
Total $1,740,316 $4,268,000 $6,008,316
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - BUDGET SECTION REPORT.
1. The supreme court may not spend funding from the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act, but may transfer funds from this line item to the salaries
and wages line items within subdivisions 1 and 2 of this Act, to the guardianship and
conservatorship line item within subdivision 1 of this Act, and to the judicial conduction
commission and disciplinary board line item within subdivision 3 of this Act, as necessary to
provide funding for:
a. Filling a new position from the date of hire through the end of the biennium; or
b. Salaries and wages if actual salaries and wages savings from vacant positions and
employee turnover, adjusted for other uses, are less than the estimate used by the
sixty-ninth legislative assembly in the development of the appropriation.
2. The supreme court shall report to the budget section regarding the use of funding in the pool,
including information on:
a. New full-time equivalent positions, including the date hired;
b. Vacant full-time equivalent positions, including information regarding positions that
become vacant and positions filled, salaries and wages savings resulting from vacant
positions and employee turnover, and the use of salaries and wages savings for other
purposes; and

S. B. NO. 2002 - PAGE 3
c. Additional salaries and wages funding needed due to savings from vacant positions
being less than anticipated.
3. If funding in the new and vacant FTE pool line item is insufficient to provide the necessary
salaries and wages funding for the biennium, the supreme court may request a deficiency
appropriation from the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION. There are appropriated any funds received by the supreme court,
district courts, and judicial conduct commission and disciplinary board, not otherwise appropriated,
pursuant to federal acts and private gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose as designated in the
federal acts or private gifts, grants, and donations, for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF GUARDIANSHIP AND CONSERVATORSHIP. There
is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated,
the sum of $355,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the office of guardianship and
conservatorship for the purpose of providing salaries, wages, and operations funding for an attorney
position transferred to the office pursuant to Senate Bill No. 2029, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND - COURT
FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT AND MAINTENANCE FUND. The office of management and budget
shall transfer the sum of $200,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the court
facilities improvement and maintenance fund during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
grand total other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $4,268,000 from the
strategic investment and improvements fund for one-time projects and programs as follows:
Case management software cloud migration $758,000
Clerk filing software 1,250,000
Court records access system 960,000
Courtroom audio and video equipment 1,200,000
Cass County courtroom equipment 100,000
Total $4,268,000
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 27-02-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-02-02. Salaries of justices of supreme court.
The annual salary of each justice of the supreme court is one hundred seventy-nine thousand three
hundred twelve dollars through June 30, 2024, and one hundred eighty-six thousand four hundred
eighty-four dollars thereafter two hundred seven thousand two hundred forty - nine dollars . The chief
justice of the supreme court is entitled to receive an additional five thousand seventy-one dollars per
annum through June 30, 2024, and five thousand two hundred seventy-fourseven thousand six hundred
forty - seven dollars per annum thereafter.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 27-05-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-05-03. Salaries and expenses of district judges.
The annual salary of each district judge is one hundred sixty-four thousand five hundred thirty-two
dollars through June 30, 2024, and one hundred seventy-one thousand one hundred thirteen dollars
thereafter one hundred eighty - four thousand three hundred sixty - six dollars . Each district judge is
entitled to travel expenses, including mileage and subsistence while engaged in the discharge of official

S. B. NO. 2002 - PAGE 4
duties outside the city in which the judge's chambers are located. The salary and expenses are payable
monthly in the manner provided by law. A presiding judge of a judicial district is entitled to receive an
additional four thousand six hundred seventy-five five thousand one hundred sixty - two dollars per
annum through June 30, 2024, and four thousand eight hundred sixty-two dollars thereafter.
SECTION 10. A new subsection to section 54-06-08.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The judicial branch may charge a reasonable fee not exceeding the discount charged by the
credit or debit card issuer. The fee may be added to a payment as a service charge for the
acceptance of a payment made by a credit or debit card. The state court administrator shall
determine which nationally recognized cards will be accepted for payments made to the
judicial branch under this section.
SECTION 11. EXEMPTION - TRANSFERS. Notwithstanding section 54-16-04, the director of the
office of management and budget shall transfer appropriation authority between line items in section 1
of this Act, as requested by the supreme court upon a finding by the court that the nature of the duties
of the court and its staff requires the transfers to carry on properly the functions of the judicial branch of
government.

S. B. NO. 2002 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2002.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 76 Nays 13 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State